Utah statutes.
59-14-506.   Contraband goods.
Any smokeless tobacco products without affixed warning labels as required by
this part, which have been in the possession of any wholesaler, distributor,
or retailer in this state for 72 hours or longer, or which have been sold by
the wholesaler, distributor, or retailer, are contraband goods.  Those
contraband goods may be seized by the commission or its employees, or by any
peace officer of the state or its political subdivisions, without a warrant.
The contraband goods shall be destroyed.
